Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-253
Mayor and city council; supplemental powers; authorized.

When the power is conferred upon the mayor and city council of any city of the first class to do and perform any act or thing, and the manner of exercising such power is not specially pointed out, the mayor and city council may provide by ordinance the details necessary for the full exercise of such power.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 120, p. 303;

R.S.1913, § 4870;

C.S.1922, § 4038;

C.S.1929, § 16-255;

R.S.1943, § 16-253;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 48.

Appointment of a board of public works is entirely optional. State ex rel. City of Grand Island v. Union Pacific R. R. Co., 152 Neb. 772, 42 N.W.2d 867 (1950).

This section is grant in nature of police power exercisable for public benefit, supplementing express powers. City of Fremont v. Lea, 115 Neb. 565, 213 N.W. 820 (1927).